Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3515
Radiation; acts; registration or license required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use, manufacture, produce, distribute, sell, transport, transfer, install, repair, receive, acquire, own, or possess any source of radiation unless registered with or licensed by the department as required by the Medical Radiography Practice Act or section 71-3505, 71-3507, or 71-3509.

Laws 1963, c. 406, § 15, p. 1306;

Laws 1975, LB 157, § 13;

Laws 1978, LB 814, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 716, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 390, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1213.

Medical Radiography Practice Act, see section 38-1901.